Missouri, session 2026, HB3303.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.039, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 144.039, to read as follows:
144.039. In addition to the exemptions granted under the provisions of section
144.030, there shall also be specifically exempted from [the provisions of sections 66.600 to
66.635, sections 67.500 to 67.545, 67.547, 67.581, 67.582, 67.671 to 67.685, 67.700 to
67.729, 67.730 to 67.739, 67.782, sections 92.400 to 92.420, sections 94.500 to 94.570,
94.600 to 94.655, 94.700 to 94.755, and sections 144.010 to 144.510 and 144.600 to 144.745
and from the computation of the] any state or local sales or use tax levied, assessed, or
payable under [sections 66.600 to 66.635, sections 67.500 to 67.545, 67.547, 67.581, 67.582,
67.671 to 67.685, 67.700 to 67.729, 67.730 to 67.739, 67.782, sections 92.400 to 92.420,
sections 94.500 to 94.570, 94.600 to 94.655, 94.700 to 94.755, and sections 144.010 to
144.510 and 144.600 to 144.745,] any state law or any local order, ordinance, or
resolution all purchases of all tangible personal property made by[,] or on behalf of, a state
senator or state representative if such purchases are made for official business purposes
from funds in such state senator's or state representative's state expense account.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.